Illinois, session 104th, HB2564.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 16-158 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/16-158)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 16-158)7    Sec. 16-158. Contributions by State and other employing 8units. 9    (a) The State shall make contributions to the System by 10means of appropriations from the Common School Fund and other 11State funds of amounts which, together with other employer 12contributions, employee contributions, investment income, and 13other income, will be sufficient to meet the cost of 14maintaining and administering the System on a 90% funded basis 15in accordance with actuarial recommendations.16    The Board shall determine the amount of State 17contributions required for each fiscal year on the basis of 18the actuarial tables and other assumptions adopted by the 19Board and the recommendations of the actuary, using the 20formula in subsection (b-3).21    (a-1) Annually, on or before November 15 until November 2215, 2011, the Board shall certify to the Governor the amount of 23the required State contribution for the coming fiscal year.   HB2564 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 05520 RPS 15549 b1The certification under this subsection (a-1) shall include a 2copy of the actuarial recommendations upon which it is based 3and shall specifically identify the System's projected State 4normal cost for that fiscal year.5    On or before May 1, 2004, the Board shall recalculate and 6recertify to the Governor the amount of the required State 7contribution to the System for State fiscal year 2005, taking 8into account the amounts appropriated to and received by the 9System under subsection (d) of Section 7.2 of the General 10Obligation Bond Act.11    On or before July 1, 2005, the Board shall recalculate and 12recertify to the Governor the amount of the required State 13contribution to the System for State fiscal year 2006, taking 14into account the changes in required State contributions made 15by Public Act 94-4. 16    On or before April 1, 2011, the Board shall recalculate 17and recertify to the Governor the amount of the required State 18contribution to the System for State fiscal year 2011, 19applying the changes made by Public Act 96-889 to the System's 20assets and liabilities as of June 30, 2009 as though Public Act 2196-889 was approved on that date. 22    (a-5) On or before November 1 of each year, beginning 23November 1, 2012, the Board shall submit to the State Actuary, 24the Governor, and the General Assembly a proposed 25certification of the amount of the required State contribution 26to the System for the next fiscal year, along with all of the   HB2564 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 05520 RPS 15549 b1actuarial assumptions, calculations, and data upon which that 2proposed certification is based. On or before January 1 of 3each year, beginning January 1, 2013, the State Actuary shall 4issue a preliminary report concerning the proposed 5certification and identifying, if necessary, recommended 6changes in actuarial assumptions that the Board must consider 7before finalizing its certification of the required State 8contributions. On or before January 15, 2013 and each January 915 thereafter, the Board shall certify to the Governor and the 10General Assembly the amount of the required State contribution 11for the next fiscal year. The Board's certification must note 12any deviations from the State Actuary's recommended changes, 13the reason or reasons for not following the State Actuary's 14recommended changes, and the fiscal impact of not following 15the State Actuary's recommended changes on the required State 16contribution. 17    (a-10) By November 1, 2017, the Board shall recalculate 18and recertify to the State Actuary, the Governor, and the 19General Assembly the amount of the State contribution to the 20System for State fiscal year 2018, taking into account the 21changes in required State contributions made by Public Act 22100-23. The State Actuary shall review the assumptions and 23valuations underlying the Board's revised certification and 24issue a preliminary report concerning the proposed 25recertification and identifying, if necessary, recommended 26changes in actuarial assumptions that the Board must consider   HB2564 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 05520 RPS 15549 b1before finalizing its certification of the required State 2contributions. The Board's final certification must note any 3deviations from the State Actuary's recommended changes, the 4reason or reasons for not following the State Actuary's 5recommended changes, and the fiscal impact of not following 6the State Actuary's recommended changes on the required State 7contribution. 8    (a-15) On or after June 15, 2019, but no later than June 930, 2019, the Board shall recalculate and recertify to the 10Governor and the General Assembly the amount of the State 11contribution to the System for State fiscal year 2019, taking 12into account the changes in required State contributions made 13by Public Act 100-587. The recalculation shall be made using 14assumptions adopted by the Board for the original fiscal year 152019 certification. The monthly voucher for the 12th month of 16fiscal year 2019 shall be paid by the Comptroller after the 17recertification required pursuant to this subsection is 18submitted to the Governor, Comptroller, and General Assembly. 19The recertification submitted to the General Assembly shall be 20filed with the Clerk of the House of Representatives and the 21Secretary of the Senate in electronic form only, in the manner 22that the Clerk and the Secretary shall direct. 23    (b) Through State fiscal year 1995, the State 24contributions shall be paid to the System in accordance with 25Section 18-7 of the School Code.26    (b-1) Unless otherwise directed by the Comptroller under   HB2564 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 05520 RPS 15549 b1subsection (b-1.1), the Board shall submit vouchers for 2payment of State contributions to the System for the 3applicable month on the 15th day of each month, or as soon 4thereafter as may be practicable. The amount vouchered for a 5monthly payment shall total one-twelfth of the required annual 6State contribution certified under subsection (a-1). 7    (b-1.1) Beginning in State fiscal year 2025, if the 8Comptroller requests that the Board submit, during a State 9fiscal year, vouchers for multiple monthly payments for the 10advance payment of State contributions due to the System for 11that State fiscal year, then the Board shall submit those 12additional vouchers as directed by the Comptroller, 13notwithstanding subsection (b-1). Unless an act of 14appropriations provides otherwise, nothing in this Section 15authorizes the Board to submit, in a State fiscal year, 16vouchers for the payment of State contributions to the System 17in an amount that exceeds the rate of payroll that is certified 18by the System under this Section for that State fiscal year. 19    (b-1.2) The vouchers described in subsections (b-1) and 20(b-1.1) shall be paid by the State Comptroller and Treasurer 21by warrants drawn on the funds appropriated to the System for 22that fiscal year.23    If in any month the amount remaining unexpended from all 24other appropriations to the System for the applicable fiscal 25year (including the appropriations to the System under Section 268.12 of the State Finance Act and Section 1 of the State   HB2564 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 05520 RPS 15549 b1Pension Funds Continuing Appropriation Act) is less than the 2amount lawfully vouchered under this subsection, the 3difference shall be paid from the Common School Fund under the 4continuing appropriation authority provided in Section 1.1 of 5the State Pension Funds Continuing Appropriation Act.6    (b-2) Allocations from the Common School Fund apportioned 7to school districts not coming under this System shall not be 8diminished or affected by the provisions of this Article.9    (b-3) For State fiscal years 2012 through 2045, the 10minimum contribution to the System to be made by the State for 11each fiscal year shall be an amount determined by the System to 12be sufficient to bring the total assets of the System up to 90% 13of the total actuarial liabilities of the System by the end of 14State fiscal year 2045. In making these determinations, the 15required State contribution shall be calculated each year as a 16level percentage of payroll over the years remaining to and 17including fiscal year 2045 and shall be determined under the 18projected unit credit actuarial cost method.19    For each of State fiscal years 2018, 2019, and 2020, the 20State shall make an additional contribution to the System 21equal to 2% of the total payroll of each employee who is deemed 22to have elected the benefits under Section 1-161 or who has 23made the election under subsection (c) of Section 1-161. 24    A change in an actuarial or investment assumption that 25increases or decreases the required State contribution and 26first applies in State fiscal year 2018 or thereafter shall be   HB2564 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 05520 RPS 15549 b1implemented in equal annual amounts over a 5-year period 2beginning in the State fiscal year in which the actuarial 3change first applies to the required State contribution.4    A change in an actuarial or investment assumption that 5increases or decreases the required State contribution and 6first applied to the State contribution in fiscal year 2014, 72015, 2016, or 2017 shall be implemented:8        (i) as already applied in State fiscal years before 9    2018; and10        (ii) in the portion of the 5-year period beginning in 11    the State fiscal year in which the actuarial change first 12    applied that occurs in State fiscal year 2018 or 13    thereafter, by calculating the change in equal annual 14    amounts over that 5-year period and then implementing it 15    at the resulting annual rate in each of the remaining 16    fiscal years in that 5-year period.17    For State fiscal years 1996 through 2005, the State 18contribution to the System, as a percentage of the applicable 19employee payroll, shall be increased in equal annual 20increments so that by State fiscal year 2011, the State is 21contributing at the rate required under this Section; except 22that in the following specified State fiscal years, the State 23contribution to the System shall not be less than the 24following indicated percentages of the applicable employee 25payroll, even if the indicated percentage will produce a State 26contribution in excess of the amount otherwise required under   HB2564 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 05520 RPS 15549 b1this subsection and subsection (a), and notwithstanding any 2contrary certification made under subsection (a-1) before May 327, 1998 (the effective date of Public Act 90-582): 10.02% in 4FY 1999; 10.77% in FY 2000; 11.47% in FY 2001; 12.16% in FY 52002; 12.86% in FY 2003; and 13.56% in FY 2004.6    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, the 7total required State contribution for State fiscal year 2006 8is $534,627,700. 9    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, the 10total required State contribution for State fiscal year 2007 11is $738,014,500. 12    For each of State fiscal years 2008 through 2009, the 13State contribution to the System, as a percentage of the 14applicable employee payroll, shall be increased in equal 15annual increments from the required State contribution for 16State fiscal year 2007, so that by State fiscal year 2011, the 17State is contributing at the rate otherwise required under 18this Section. 19    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, the 20total required State contribution for State fiscal year 2010 21is $2,089,268,000 and shall be made from the proceeds of bonds 22sold in fiscal year 2010 pursuant to Section 7.2 of the General 23Obligation Bond Act, less (i) the pro rata share of bond sale 24expenses determined by the System's share of total bond 25proceeds, (ii) any amounts received from the Common School 26Fund in fiscal year 2010, and (iii) any reduction in bond   HB2564 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 05520 RPS 15549 b1proceeds due to the issuance of discounted bonds, if 2applicable. 3    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, the 4total required State contribution for State fiscal year 2011 5is the amount recertified by the System on or before April 1, 62011 pursuant to subsection (a-1) of this Section and shall be 7made from the proceeds of bonds sold in fiscal year 2011 8pursuant to Section 7.2 of the General Obligation Bond Act, 9less (i) the pro rata share of bond sale expenses determined by 10the System's share of total bond proceeds, (ii) any amounts 11received from the Common School Fund in fiscal year 2011, and 12(iii) any reduction in bond proceeds due to the issuance of 13discounted bonds, if applicable. This amount shall include, in 14addition to the amount certified by the System, an amount 15necessary to meet employer contributions required by the State 16as an employer under paragraph (e) of this Section, which may 17also be used by the System for contributions required by 18paragraph (a) of Section 16-127. 19    Beginning in State fiscal year 2046, the minimum State 20contribution for each fiscal year shall be the amount needed 21to maintain the total assets of the System at 90% of the total 22actuarial liabilities of the System.23    Amounts received by the System pursuant to Section 25 of 24the Budget Stabilization Act or Section 8.12 of the State 25Finance Act in any fiscal year do not reduce and do not 26constitute payment of any portion of the minimum State   HB2564 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 05520 RPS 15549 b1contribution required under this Article in that fiscal year. 2Such amounts shall not reduce, and shall not be included in the 3calculation of, the required State contributions under this 4Article in any future year until the System has reached a 5funding ratio of at least 90%. A reference in this Article to 6the "required State contribution" or any substantially similar 7term does not include or apply to any amounts payable to the 8System under Section 25 of the Budget Stabilization Act.9    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, the 10required State contribution for State fiscal year 2005 and for 11fiscal year 2008 and each fiscal year thereafter, as 12calculated under this Section and certified under subsection 13(a-1), shall not exceed an amount equal to (i) the amount of 14the required State contribution that would have been 15calculated under this Section for that fiscal year if the 16System had not received any payments under subsection (d) of 17Section 7.2 of the General Obligation Bond Act, minus (ii) the 18portion of the State's total debt service payments for that 19fiscal year on the bonds issued in fiscal year 2003 for the 20purposes of that Section 7.2, as determined and certified by 21the Comptroller, that is the same as the System's portion of 22the total moneys distributed under subsection (d) of Section 237.2 of the General Obligation Bond Act. In determining this 24maximum for State fiscal years 2008 through 2010, however, the 25amount referred to in item (i) shall be increased, as a 26percentage of the applicable employee payroll, in equal   HB2564 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 05520 RPS 15549 b1increments calculated from the sum of the required State 2contribution for State fiscal year 2007 plus the applicable 3portion of the State's total debt service payments for fiscal 4year 2007 on the bonds issued in fiscal year 2003 for the 5purposes of Section 7.2 of the General Obligation Bond Act, so 6that, by State fiscal year 2011, the State is contributing at 7the rate otherwise required under this Section.8    (b-4) Beginning in fiscal year 2018, each employer under 9this Article shall pay to the System a required contribution 10determined as a percentage of projected payroll and sufficient 11to produce an annual amount equal to:12        (i) for each of fiscal years 2018, 2019, and 2020, the 13    defined benefit normal cost of the defined benefit plan, 14    less the employee contribution, for each employee of that 15    employer who has elected or who is deemed to have elected 16    the benefits under Section 1-161 or who has made the 17    election under subsection (b) of Section 1-161; for fiscal 18    year 2021 and each fiscal year thereafter, the defined 19    benefit normal cost of the defined benefit plan, less the 20    employee contribution, plus 2%, for each employee of that 21    employer who has elected or who is deemed to have elected 22    the benefits under Section 1-161 or who has made the 23    election under subsection (b) of Section 1-161; plus24        (ii) the amount required for that fiscal year to 25    amortize any unfunded actuarial accrued liability 26    associated with the present value of liabilities   HB2564 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 05520 RPS 15549 b1    attributable to the employer's account under Section 2    16-158.3, determined as a level percentage of payroll over 3    a 30-year rolling amortization period.4    In determining contributions required under item (i) of 5this subsection, the System shall determine an aggregate rate 6for all employers, expressed as a percentage of projected 7payroll. 8    In determining the contributions required under item (ii) 9of this subsection, the amount shall be computed by the System 10on the basis of the actuarial assumptions and tables used in 11the most recent actuarial valuation of the System that is 12available at the time of the computation. 13    The contributions required under this subsection (b-4) 14shall be paid by an employer concurrently with that employer's 15payroll payment period. The State, as the actual employer of 16an employee, shall make the required contributions under this 17subsection. 18    (c) Payment of the required State contributions and of all 19pensions, retirement annuities, death benefits, refunds, and 20other benefits granted under or assumed by this System, and 21all expenses in connection with the administration and 22operation thereof, are obligations of the State.23    If members are paid from special trust or federal funds 24which are administered by the employing unit, whether school 25district or other unit, the employing unit shall pay to the 26System from such funds the full accruing retirement costs   HB2564 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 05520 RPS 15549 b1based upon that service, which, beginning July 1, 2017, shall 2be at a rate, expressed as a percentage of salary, equal to the 3total employer's normal cost, expressed as a percentage of 4payroll, as determined by the System. Employer contributions, 5based on salary paid to members from federal funds, may be 6forwarded by the distributing agency of the State of Illinois 7to the System prior to allocation, in an amount determined in 8accordance with guidelines established by such agency and the 9System. Any contribution for fiscal year 2015 collected as a 10result of the change made by Public Act 98-674 shall be 11considered a State contribution under subsection (b-3) of this 12Section. 13    (d) Effective July 1, 1986, any employer of a teacher as 14defined in paragraph (8) of Section 16-106 shall pay the 15employer's normal cost of benefits based upon the teacher's 16service, in addition to employee contributions, as determined 17by the System. Such employer contributions shall be forwarded 18monthly in accordance with guidelines established by the 19System.20    However, with respect to benefits granted under Section 2116-133.4 or 16-133.5 to a teacher as defined in paragraph (8) 22of Section 16-106, the employer's contribution shall be 12% 23(rather than 20%) of the member's highest annual salary rate 24for each year of creditable service granted, and the employer 25shall also pay the required employee contribution on behalf of 26the teacher. For the purposes of Sections 16-133.4 and   HB2564 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 05520 RPS 15549 b116-133.5, a teacher as defined in paragraph (8) of Section 216-106 who is serving in that capacity while on leave of 3absence from another employer under this Article shall not be 4considered an employee of the employer from which the teacher 5is on leave.6    (e) Beginning July 1, 1998, every employer of a teacher 7shall pay to the System an employer contribution computed as 8follows:9        (1) Beginning July 1, 1998 through June 30, 1999, the 10    employer contribution shall be equal to 0.3% of each 11    teacher's salary.12        (2) Beginning July 1, 1999 and thereafter, the 13    employer contribution shall be equal to 0.58% of each 14    teacher's salary.15The school district or other employing unit may pay these 16employer contributions out of any source of funding available 17for that purpose and shall forward the contributions to the 18System on the schedule established for the payment of member 19contributions.20    These employer contributions are intended to offset a 21portion of the cost to the System of the increases in 22retirement benefits resulting from Public Act 90-582.23    Each employer of teachers is entitled to a credit against 24the contributions required under this subsection (e) with 25respect to salaries paid to teachers for the period January 1, 262002 through June 30, 2003, equal to the amount paid by that   HB2564 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 05520 RPS 15549 b1employer under subsection (a-5) of Section 6.6 of the State 2Employees Group Insurance Act of 1971 with respect to salaries 3paid to teachers for that period.4    The additional 1% employee contribution required under 5Section 16-152 by Public Act 90-582 is the responsibility of 6the teacher and not the teacher's employer, unless the 7employer agrees, through collective bargaining or otherwise, 8to make the contribution on behalf of the teacher.9    If an employer is required by a contract in effect on May 101, 1998 between the employer and an employee organization to 11pay, on behalf of all its full-time employees covered by this 12Article, all mandatory employee contributions required under 13this Article, then the employer shall be excused from paying 14the employer contribution required under this subsection (e) 15for the balance of the term of that contract. The employer and 16the employee organization shall jointly certify to the System 17the existence of the contractual requirement, in such form as 18the System may prescribe. This exclusion shall cease upon the 19termination, extension, or renewal of the contract at any time 20after May 1, 1998.21    (f) If the amount of a teacher's salary for any school year 22used to determine final average salary exceeds the member's 23annual full-time salary rate with the same employer for the 24previous school year by more than 6%, the teacher's employer 25shall pay to the System, in addition to all other payments 26required under this Section and in accordance with guidelines   HB2564 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 05520 RPS 15549 b1established by the System, the present value of the increase 2in benefits resulting from the portion of the increase in 3salary that is in excess of 6%. This present value shall be 4computed by the System on the basis of the actuarial 5assumptions and tables used in the most recent actuarial 6valuation of the System that is available at the time of the 7computation. If a teacher's salary for the 2005-2006 school 8year is used to determine final average salary under this 9subsection (f), then the changes made to this subsection (f) 10by Public Act 94-1057 shall apply in calculating whether the 11increase in his or her salary is in excess of 6%. For the 12purposes of this Section, change in employment under Section 1310-21.12 of the School Code on or after June 1, 2005 shall 14constitute a change in employer. The System may require the 15employer to provide any pertinent information or 16documentation. The changes made to this subsection (f) by 17Public Act 94-1111 apply without regard to whether the teacher 18was in service on or after its effective date. 19    Whenever it determines that a payment is or may be 20required under this subsection, the System shall calculate the 21amount of the payment and bill the employer for that amount. 22The bill shall specify the calculations used to determine the 23amount due. If the employer disputes the amount of the bill, it 24may, within 30 days after receipt of the bill, apply to the 25System in writing for a recalculation. The application must 26specify in detail the grounds of the dispute and, if the   HB2564 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 05520 RPS 15549 b1employer asserts that the calculation is subject to subsection 2(g), (g-5), (g-10), (g-15), (g-20), (g-25), or (h) of this 3Section, must include an affidavit setting forth and attesting 4to all facts within the employer's knowledge that are 5pertinent to the applicability of that subsection. Upon 6receiving a timely application for recalculation, the System 7shall review the application and, if appropriate, recalculate 8the amount due. 9    The employer contributions required under this subsection 10(f) may be paid in the form of a lump sum within 90 days after 11receipt of the bill. If the employer contributions are not 12paid within 90 days after receipt of the bill, then interest 13will be charged at a rate equal to the System's annual 14actuarially assumed rate of return on investment compounded 15annually from the 91st day after receipt of the bill. Payments 16must be concluded within 7 years after the employer's receipt 17of the bill. 18    (f-1) (Blank).19    (g) This subsection (g) applies only to payments made or 20salary increases given on or after June 1, 2005 but before July 211, 2011. The changes made by Public Act 94-1057 shall not 22require the System to refund any payments received before July 2331, 2006 (the effective date of Public Act 94-1057).24    When assessing payment for any amount due under subsection 25(f), the System shall exclude salary increases paid to 26teachers under contracts or collective bargaining agreements   HB2564 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 05520 RPS 15549 b1entered into, amended, or renewed before June 1, 2005. 2    When assessing payment for any amount due under subsection 3(f), the System shall exclude salary increases paid to a 4teacher at a time when the teacher is 10 or more years from 5retirement eligibility under Section 16-132 or 16-133.2. 6    When assessing payment for any amount due under subsection 7(f), the System shall exclude salary increases resulting from 8overload work, including summer school, when the school 9district has certified to the System, and the System has 10approved the certification, that (i) the overload work is for 11the sole purpose of classroom instruction in excess of the 12standard number of classes for a full-time teacher in a school 13district during a school year and (ii) the salary increases 14are equal to or less than the rate of pay for classroom 15instruction computed on the teacher's current salary and work 16schedule. 17    When assessing payment for any amount due under subsection 18(f), the System shall exclude a salary increase resulting from 19a promotion (i) for which the employee is required to hold a 20certificate or supervisory endorsement issued by the State 21Teacher Certification Board that is a different certification 22or supervisory endorsement than is required for the teacher's 23previous position and (ii) to a position that has existed and 24been filled by a member for no less than one complete academic 25year and the salary increase from the promotion is an increase 26that results in an amount no greater than the lesser of the   HB2564 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 05520 RPS 15549 b1average salary paid for other similar positions in the 2district requiring the same certification or the amount 3stipulated in the collective bargaining agreement for a 4similar position requiring the same certification. 5    When assessing payment for any amount due under subsection 6(f), the System shall exclude any payment to the teacher from 7the State of Illinois or the State Board of Education over 8which the employer does not have discretion, notwithstanding 9that the payment is included in the computation of final 10average salary. 11    (g-5) When assessing payment for any amount due under 12subsection (f), the System shall exclude salary increases 13resulting from overload or stipend work performed in a school 14year subsequent to a school year in which the employer was 15unable to offer or allow to be conducted overload or stipend 16work due to an emergency declaration limiting such activities.17    (g-10) When assessing payment for any amount due under 18subsection (f), the System shall exclude salary increases 19resulting from increased instructional time that exceeded the 20instructional time required during the 2019-2020 school year. 21    (g-15) When assessing payment for any amount due under 22subsection (f), the System shall exclude salary increases 23resulting from teaching summer school on or after May 1, 2021 24and before September 15, 2022. 25    (g-20) When assessing payment for any amount due under 26subsection (f), the System shall exclude salary increases   HB2564 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 05520 RPS 15549 b1necessary to bring a school board in compliance with Public 2Act 101-443 or this amendatory Act of the 103rd General 3Assembly. 4    (g-25) When assessing payment for any amount due under 5subsection (f), the System shall exclude salary increases 6given on or after the effective date of this amendatory Act of 7the 104th General Assembly resulting from overload work, 8summer school work, or stipend work, when the school district 9has certified to the System, and the System has approved the 10certification, that the overload work, summer school work, or 11the stipend work is for the sole purpose of classroom 12instruction in excess of the standard number of classes for a 13full-time teacher in a school district during a school year. 14    (h) When assessing payment for any amount due under 15subsection (f), the System shall exclude any salary increase 16described in subsection (g) of this Section given on or after 17July 1, 2011 but before July 1, 2014 under a contract or 18collective bargaining agreement entered into, amended, or 19renewed on or after June 1, 2005 but before July 1, 2011. 20Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, any 21payments made or salary increases given after June 30, 2014 22shall be used in assessing payment for any amount due under 23subsection (f) of this Section. 24    (i) The System shall prepare a report and file copies of 25the report with the Governor and the General Assembly by 26January 1, 2007 that contains all of the following   HB2564 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 05520 RPS 15549 b1information:2        (1) The number of recalculations required by the 3    changes made to this Section by Public Act 94-1057 for 4    each employer.5        (2) The dollar amount by which each employer's 6    contribution to the System was changed due to 7    recalculations required by Public Act 94-1057.8        (3) The total amount the System received from each 9    employer as a result of the changes made to this Section by 10    Public Act 94-4.11        (4) The increase in the required State contribution 12    resulting from the changes made to this Section by Public 13    Act 94-1057. 14    (i-5) For school years beginning on or after July 1, 2017, 15if the amount of a participant's salary for any school year 16exceeds the amount of the salary set for the Governor, the 17participant's employer shall pay to the System, in addition to 18all other payments required under this Section and in 19accordance with guidelines established by the System, an 20amount determined by the System to be equal to the employer 21normal cost, as established by the System and expressed as a 22total percentage of payroll, multiplied by the amount of 23salary in excess of the amount of the salary set for the 24Governor. This amount shall be computed by the System on the 25basis of the actuarial assumptions and tables used in the most 26recent actuarial valuation of the System that is available at   HB2564 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 05520 RPS 15549 b1the time of the computation. The System may require the 2employer to provide any pertinent information or 3documentation.4    Whenever it determines that a payment is or may be 5required under this subsection, the System shall calculate the 6amount of the payment and bill the employer for that amount. 7The bill shall specify the calculations used to determine the 8amount due. If the employer disputes the amount of the bill, it 9may, within 30 days after receipt of the bill, apply to the 10System in writing for a recalculation. The application must 11specify in detail the grounds of the dispute. Upon receiving a 12timely application for recalculation, the System shall review 13the application and, if appropriate, recalculate the amount 14due. 15    The employer contributions required under this subsection 16may be paid in the form of a lump sum within 90 days after 17receipt of the bill. If the employer contributions are not 18paid within 90 days after receipt of the bill, then interest 19will be charged at a rate equal to the System's annual 20actuarially assumed rate of return on investment compounded 21annually from the 91st day after receipt of the bill. Payments 22must be concluded within 3 years after the employer's receipt 23of the bill. 24    (j) For purposes of determining the required State 25contribution to the System, the value of the System's assets 26shall be equal to the actuarial value of the System's assets,   HB2564 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 05520 RPS 15549 b1which shall be calculated as follows:2    As of June 30, 2008, the actuarial value of the System's 3assets shall be equal to the market value of the assets as of 4that date. In determining the actuarial value of the System's 5assets for fiscal years after June 30, 2008, any actuarial 6gains or losses from investment return incurred in a fiscal 7year shall be recognized in equal annual amounts over the 85-year period following that fiscal year. 9    (k) For purposes of determining the required State 10contribution to the system for a particular year, the 11actuarial value of assets shall be assumed to earn a rate of 12return equal to the system's actuarially assumed rate of 13return. 14(Source: P.A. 103-515, eff. 8-11-23; 103-588, eff. 6-5-24; 15104-284, eff. 1-1-26.) 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.